California, session 20252026, AB1349.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 22502.1 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 22502.1 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:22502.1. (a) For purposes of this section, “speculative ticket sale” means the advertisement, listing, marketing, offer for sale, contract for sale, acceptance of payment for, or sale of a ticket by a person other than a ticket resale marketplace who, at the time of the advertisement, listing, marketing, offer for sale, contract for sale, acceptance of payment for, or sale, does not have either of the following:(1) Actual or constructive possession of the ticket. Constructive possession means that the person has fully paid for the ticket, holds a legally enforceable right to receive delivery of the ticket, and has received confirmation of purchase or assignment from the original ticket seller, event presenter, or venue operator.(2) Authorization from the event presenter or venue operator to sell the ticket.(b) A ticket resale marketplace shall not knowingly or recklessly process payment, collect a fee, advertise, list, market, offer for sale, contract for sale, accept payment for, or facilitate the completion of a speculative ticket sale, and it shall implement reasonable measures designed to prevent speculative ticket sales on its platform.(b)(c) A ticket seller shall not engage in a speculative ticket sale.(c)(d) A ticket seller shall not advertise, list, market, offer for sale, contract for sale, accept payment for, or sell a ticket before the ticket has been made available for sale by the event presenter, venue operator, rights holder, or original seller, unless expressly authorized by the event presenter, venue operator, rights holder, or original seller unless the ticket seller has constructive possession of the ticket as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(d)A ticket resale marketplace shall not knowingly process payment, collect a fee, or facilitate the completion of a speculative ticket sale, and it shall implement reasonable measures designed to prevent speculative ticket sales on its platform.(e)A violation of this section constitutes an unlawful business practice pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7.SEC. 3. Section 22502.3 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:22502.3. In addition to other remedies, a ticket seller, original seller, ticket reseller, or ticket retail marketplace that violates Section 22502.1 or 22502.2 and fails to supply a ticket at or below a contracted price or within a contracted price range shall be civilly liable to the ticket purchaser for two times the contracted price of the ticket, in addition to any sum expended by the purchaser in nonrefundable expenses for attending or attempting to attend the event in good faith reliance on seat or space availability, and reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.SEC. 4.Section 22502.6 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:22502.6.(a)Except as otherwise required by law or reasonably necessary to address fraud, theft, unauthorized account access, violations of this chapter, or the administration of a season ticket membership, premium seat license, fan club membership, loyalty program, or similar ticketing program, an event presenter, venue operator, rights holder, original seller, or ticket seller shall not revoke, cancel, invalidate, deny admission, or render unusable a ticket based solely upon the lawful transfer or resale of that ticket.(b)Nothing in this section prohibits reasonable measures to:(1)Prevent fraud.(2)Enforce ticket purchasing limits.(3)Investigate violations of law.(4)Protect the security of ticketing systems and consumer accounts.(5)Administer season ticket memberships, premium seat licenses, fan club memberships, loyalty programs, or other similar ticketing programs.(c)This section shall not be construed to require an event presenter, venue operator, rights holder, original seller, or ticket seller to offer, renew, extend, transfer, or assign any season ticket membership, premium seat license, fan club membership, loyalty program benefit, or similar contractual right.SEC. 5.SEC. 4. Section 22503 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 6.SEC. 5. Section 22503 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:22503. For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Consumer” means a natural person who purchases a ticket with the reasonable expectation of attending an event.(b) “Event presenter” means the person or organization responsible for a sporting, musical, theater, or other entertainment event for which tickets are sold, including a rights holder or their authorized agent.(c) “Onsale” means the official date and time when tickets for an event become available to the general public.(c)(d) “Original seller” means a person who, for compensation, commission, or otherwise, advertises, lists, markets for sale, or sells an admission ticket to a sporting, musical, theater, or other entertainment event for original sale as instructed by an event presenter or venue operator.(d)(e) “Rights holder” means an artist, performing arts organization, theater company, dance company, professional athletic team, professional athletic league, author, lecturer, or other person that is a primary performer, participant, speaker, or presenter at an event for which tickets are sold.(e)(f) “Ticket resale marketplace” means an entity that, for compensation, commission, or otherwise, operates a website or other online application that advertises, lists, markets for sale, processes payments for, or facilitates the resale of admission tickets for, a sporting, musical, theater, or other entertainment event between third parties, and includes an original seller to the extent that the original seller operates a website or other online application that advertises, lists, markets for sale, processes payments for, or facilitates resale. resale or original sale of tickets that were not offered to the general public during the public onsale.(f)(g) “Ticket reseller” means a person or entity, other than a consumer or season ticket holder, who, for compensation, commission, or otherwise, advertises, lists, markets for sale, offers for sale, facilitates the sale of, or sells admission tickets to, a sporting, musical, theater, or other entertainment event on the secondary market.(g)(h) “Ticket seller” means a person who, for compensation, commission, or otherwise, advertises, lists, markets for sale, offers for sale, facilitates the sale of, or sells an admission ticket to, a sporting, musical, theater, or other entertainment event.(h)(i) “Venue operator” means a person who owns, operates, manages, or controls a venue at which a sporting, musical, theater, or other entertainment event is presented.(i)(j) “Season ticket holder” means a person who purchases a package of tickets for multiple events from an original seller, event presenter, rights holder, or venue operator pursuant to a season ticket membership, subscription, premium seat license, or similar ticketing program.SEC. 7.SEC. 6. Section 22503.5 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 8.SEC. 7. Section 22505.5 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 9.SEC. 8. Section 22505.5 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:22505.5. Notwithstanding Section 22503.4, 22504, or 22511, it shall be unlawful for a person to knowingly use, cause to be used, provide, sell, offer for sale, market, or facilitate software or services to do, or otherwise engage in, any of the following:(a) Purchase tickets in excess of posted limits for an online event ticket sale.(b) Circumvent or evade an electronic queue, waiting period, presale restriction or presale code, ticket purchasing limit, account limitation, or other ticket distribution control established and disclosed by the event presenter, venue operator, rights holder, or ticket seller.(c) Circumvent or disable a security measure, access control system, or other control or measure used to facilitate authorized ticket sales or authorized entry into an event.(d) Utilize multiple Internet Protocol addresses, multiple purchaser accounts, multiple email addresses, or other technological means to purchase tickets in excess of posted ticket limits or otherwise evade ticket purchasing restrictions established pursuant to subdivision (b).(e) Use software, services, automated means, or other technological methods to automate, coordinate, facilitate, or otherwise enable conduct prohibited by this section.SEC. 10.SEC. 9. Section 22505.6 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:22505.6. (a) It shall be unlawful for a person, ticket seller, original seller, ticket reseller, ticket resale marketplace, or other person acting in connection with the sale or resale of tickets to advertise, market, or offer tickets for sale in a manner that is likely to mislead a reasonable consumer regarding the source, sponsorship, authorization, availability, price, or nature of the ticket being offered.(b) A person shall not use an internet website, internet address, domain name, trade name, trademark, service mark, logo, design, text, image, or other identifying characteristic, or any combination thereof, that is substantially similar to, or reasonably likely to be confused with, that of an event presenter, venue operator, rights holder, original seller, or authorized agent, if displayed with an intent to confuse or deceive consumers or where such display is reasonably likely to confuse or deceive consumers a reasonable consumer regarding the source, sponsorship, authorization, or affiliation of the website or advertisement.(c) A person shall not represent or imply that:(1) A ticket is available from an authorized source when the ticket is being offered through resale.(2) A live entertainment event is sold out when tickets remain available from the original seller or an authorized seller.(3) A consumer is purchasing a ticket from an event presenter, venue operator, rights holder, original seller, or authorized agent when the consumer is purchasing from a reseller or ticket resale marketplace.(4) A ticket listing reflects a specific seat, section, row, or location if the seller does not have a reasonable basis to make that representation.(d) A violation of this section constitutes false or misleading advertising for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Part 3 of Division 7 and an unlawful business practice for purposes of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7.SEC. 11.SEC. 10. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.